West Virginia, session 2025, HB2281.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 8 - 1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17A-3-25 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (State Vehicle Title, Registration and Relicensing Project of 2018, 91 CSR 24), is authorized.